isv_lat_hunspell_dict.aff
FLAG long
SFX BD Y 68
SFX BD ti l .
SFX BD ti la .
SFX BD ti lo .
SFX BD ti li .
SFX BD iti u .
SFX BD ti m .
SFX BD ti š .
SFX BD ti 0 .
SFX BD ti mo .
SFX BD i e .
SFX BD iti et .
SFX BD ti h .
SFX BD ti še .
SFX BD ti hmo .
SFX BD ti ste .
SFX BD ti hu .
SFX BD iti eči .
SFX BD iti eča .
SFX BD iti eče .
SFX BD ti my .
SFX BD ti mogo .
SFX BD ti momu .
SFX BD ti mym .
SFX BD ti mom .
SFX BD ti mo .
SFX BD ti ma .
SFX BD ti mu .
SFX BD ti moj .
SFX BD ti moju .
SFX BD ti mi .
SFX BD ti me .
SFX BD ti myh .
SFX BD ti mym .
SFX BD ti mymi .
SFX BD ti vši .
SFX BD ti všego .
SFX BD ti všemu .
SFX BD ti všim .
SFX BD ti všem .
SFX BD ti vših .
SFX BD ti všimi .
SFX BD ti vša .
SFX BD ti všu .
SFX BD ti všej .
SFX BD ti všeju .
SFX BD ti vše .
SFX BD iti eny .
SFX BD iti enogo .
SFX BD iti enomu .
SFX BD iti enym .
SFX BD iti enom .
SFX BD iti eni .
SFX BD iti ene .
SFX BD iti enyh .
SFX BD iti enymi .
SFX BD iti ena .
SFX BD iti enu .
SFX BD iti enoj .
SFX BD iti enoju .
SFX BD iti eno .
SFX BD iti enje .
SFX BD iti enja .
SFX BD iti enju .
SFX BD iti enjem .
SFX BD iti enij .
SFX BD iti enjam .
SFX BD iti enjami .
SFX BD iti enjah .

SFX BE Y 68
SFX BE ti l .
SFX BE ti la .
SFX BE ti lo .
SFX BE ti li .
SFX BE ati u .
SFX BE ati im .
SFX BE ati iš .
SFX BE ati i .
SFX BE ati imo .
SFX BE ati ite .
SFX BE ati et .
SFX BE ti h .
SFX BE ti še .
SFX BE ti hmo .
SFX BE ti ste .
SFX BE ti hu .
SFX BE ati eči .
SFX BE ati eča .
SFX BE ati eče .
SFX BE ati imy .
SFX BE ati imogo .
SFX BE ati imomu .
SFX BE ati imym .
SFX BE ati imom .
SFX BE ati imo .
SFX BE ati ima .
SFX BE ati imu .
SFX BE ati imoj .
SFX BE ati imoju .
SFX BE ati imi .
SFX BE ati ime .
SFX BE ati imyh .
SFX BE ati imym .
SFX BE ati imymi .
SFX BE ti vši .
SFX BE ti všego .
SFX BE ti všemu .
SFX BE ti všim .
SFX BE ti všem .
SFX BE ti vših .
SFX BE ti všimi .
SFX BE ti vša .
SFX BE ti všu .
SFX BE ti všej .
SFX BE ti všeju .
SFX BE ti vše .
SFX BE ti ny .
SFX BE ti nogo .
SFX BE ti nomu .
SFX BE ti nym .
SFX BE ti nom .
SFX BE ti ni .
SFX BE ti ne .
SFX BE ti nyh .
SFX BE ti nymi .
SFX BE ti na .
SFX BE ti nu .
SFX BE ti noj .
SFX BE ti noju .
SFX BE ti no .
SFX BE ti nje .
SFX BE ti nja .
SFX BE ti nju .
SFX BE ti njem .
SFX BE ti nij .
SFX BE ti njam .
SFX BE ti njami .
SFX BE ti njah .

SFX BF Y 11
SFX BF e i .
SFX BF 0 te .
SFX BF 0 ta .
SFX BF e ij .
SFX BF 0 ti .
SFX BF 0 tu .
SFX BF e ah .
SFX BF e am .
SFX BF 0 tem .
SFX BF 0 tom .
SFX BF e ami .

SFX BG Y 9
SFX BG n 0 .
SFX BG 0 a .
SFX BG in ov .
SFX BG 0 u .
SFX BG in ah .
SFX BG in am .
SFX BG 0 om .
SFX BG in ami .
SFX BG 0 e .

SFX BH Y 4
SFX BH to ego .
SFX BH to em .
SFX BH to emu .
SFX BH to im .

SFX BI Y 80
SFX BI ti l .
SFX BI ti la .
SFX BI ti lo .
SFX BI ti li .
SFX BI ti m .
SFX BI ti š .
SFX BI ti 0 .
SFX BI ti mo .
SFX BI i e .
SFX BI ti dut .
SFX BI ti h .
SFX BI ti še .
SFX BI ti hmo .
SFX BI ti ste .
SFX BI ti hu .
SFX BI ti j .
SFX BI ti jmo .
SFX BI ti jte .
SFX BI ti duči .
SFX BI ti dučego .
SFX BI ti dučemu .
SFX BI ti dučim .
SFX BI ti dučem .
SFX BI ti dučih .
SFX BI ti dučimi .
SFX BI ti duča .
SFX BI ti duču .
SFX BI ti dučej .
SFX BI ti dučeju .
SFX BI ti duče .
SFX BI ti domy .
SFX BI ti domogo .
SFX BI ti domomu .
SFX BI ti domym .
SFX BI ti domom .
SFX BI ti domo .
SFX BI ti doma .
SFX BI ti domu .
SFX BI ti domoj .
SFX BI ti domoju .
SFX BI ti domi .
SFX BI ti dome .
SFX BI ti domyh .
SFX BI ti domym .
SFX BI ti domymi .
SFX BI ti domo .
SFX BI ti vši .
SFX BI ti všego .
SFX BI ti všemu .
SFX BI ti všim .
SFX BI ti všem .
SFX BI ti vših .
SFX BI ti všimi .
SFX BI ti vša .
SFX BI ti všu .
SFX BI ti všej .
SFX BI ti všeju .
SFX BI ti vše .
SFX BI ti ny .
SFX BI ti nogo .
SFX BI ti nomu .
SFX BI ti nym .
SFX BI ti nom .
SFX BI ti ni .
SFX BI ti ne .
SFX BI ti nyh .
SFX BI ti nymi .
SFX BI ti na .
SFX BI ti nu .
SFX BI ti noj .
SFX BI ti noju .
SFX BI ti no .
SFX BI ti nje .
SFX BI ti nja .
SFX BI ti nju .
SFX BI ti njem .
SFX BI ti nij .
SFX BI ti njam .
SFX BI ti njami .
SFX BI ti njah .

SFX BJ Y 4
SFX BJ to-nebud ogo-nebud .
SFX BJ to-nebud om-nebud .
SFX BJ to-nebud omu-nebud .
SFX BJ to-nebud ym-nebud .

SFX BK Y 80
SFX BK ti l .
SFX BK ti la .
SFX BK ti lo .
SFX BK ti li .
SFX BK zati žu .
SFX BK zati žem .
SFX BK zati žeš .
SFX BK zati že .
SFX BK zati žemo .
SFX BK zati žete .
SFX BK zati žut .
SFX BK ti h .
SFX BK ti še .
SFX BK ti hmo .
SFX BK ti ste .
SFX BK ti hu .
SFX BK zati ži .
SFX BK zati žimo .
SFX BK zati žite .
SFX BK zati žuči .
SFX BK zati žučego .
SFX BK zati žučemu .
SFX BK zati žučim .
SFX BK zati žučem .
SFX BK zati žučih .
SFX BK zati žučimi .
SFX BK zati žuča .
SFX BK zati žuču .
SFX BK zati žučej .
SFX BK zati žučeju .
SFX BK zati žuče .
SFX BK zati žemy .
SFX BK zati žemogo .
SFX BK zati žemomu .
SFX BK zati žemym .
SFX BK zati žemom .
SFX BK zati žemo .
SFX BK zati žema .
SFX BK zati žemu .
SFX BK zati žemoj .
SFX BK zati žemoju .
SFX BK zati žemi .
SFX BK zati žeme .
SFX BK zati žemyh .
SFX BK zati žemym .
SFX BK zati žemymi .
SFX BK ti vši .
SFX BK ti všego .
SFX BK ti všemu .
SFX BK ti všim .
SFX BK ti všem .
SFX BK ti vših .
SFX BK ti všimi .
SFX BK ti vša .
SFX BK ti všu .
SFX BK ti všej .
SFX BK ti všeju .
SFX BK ti vše .
SFX BK ti ny .
SFX BK ti nogo .
SFX BK ti nomu .
SFX BK ti nym .
SFX BK ti nom .
SFX BK ti ni .
SFX BK ti ne .
SFX BK ti nyh .
SFX BK ti nymi .
SFX BK ti na .
SFX BK ti nu .
SFX BK ti noj .
SFX BK ti noju .
SFX BK ti no .
SFX BK ti nje .
SFX BK ti nja .
SFX BK ti nju .
SFX BK ti njem .
SFX BK ti nij .
SFX BK ti njam .
SFX BK ti njami .
SFX BK ti njah .

SFX BL Y 4
SFX BL obě ebe .
SFX BL obě e .
SFX BL obě i .
SFX BL ě oju .

SFX BM Y 4
SFX BM i ebe .
SFX BM i e .
SFX BM i obě .
SFX BM i oboju .

SFX BN Y 62
SFX BN ti l .
SFX BN ti la .
SFX BN ti lo .
SFX BN ti li .
SFX BN ti ju .
SFX BN ti jem .
SFX BN ti ješ .
SFX BN ti je .
SFX BN ti jemo .
SFX BN ti jete .
SFX BN ti jut .
SFX BN ti h .
SFX BN ti še .
SFX BN ti hmo .
SFX BN ti ste .
SFX BN ti hu .
SFX BN ti j .
SFX BN ti jmo .
SFX BN ti jte .
SFX BN ti juči .
SFX BN ti jučego .
SFX BN ti jučemu .
SFX BN ti jučim .
SFX BN ti jučem .
SFX BN ti jučih .
SFX BN ti jučimi .
SFX BN ti juča .
SFX BN ti juču .
SFX BN ti jučej .
SFX BN ti jučeju .
SFX BN ti juče .
SFX BN ti jemy .
SFX BN ti jemogo .
SFX BN ti jemomu .
SFX BN ti jemym .
SFX BN ti jemom .
SFX BN ti jemo .
SFX BN ti jema .
SFX BN ti jemu .
SFX BN ti jemoj .
SFX BN ti jemoju .
SFX BN ti jemi .
SFX BN ti jeme .
SFX BN ti jemyh .
SFX BN ti jemym .
SFX BN ti jemymi .
SFX BN ti vši .
SFX BN ti všego .
SFX BN ti všemu .
SFX BN ti všim .
SFX BN ti všem .
SFX BN ti vših .
SFX BN ti všimi .
SFX BN ti vša .
SFX BN ti všu .
SFX BN ti všej .
SFX BN ti všeju .
SFX BN ti vše .
SFX BN i y .
SFX BN i a .
SFX BN i o .
SFX BN i je .

SFX BO Y 9
SFX BO 0 y .
SFX BO 0 a .
SFX BO 0 ov .
SFX BO 0 u .
SFX BO 0 ah .
SFX BO 0 am .
SFX BO 0 om .
SFX BO 0 ami .
SFX BO k če .

SFX BP Y 16
SFX BP j 0 .
SFX BP j i .
SFX BP 0 e .
SFX BP j e .
SFX BP 0 a .
SFX BP j ev .
SFX BP 0 ev .
SFX BP 0 u .
SFX BP j ah .
SFX BP 0 ah .
SFX BP j am .
SFX BP 0 am .
SFX BP j em .
SFX BP 0 em .
SFX BP j ami .
SFX BP 0 ami .

SFX BQ Y 17
SFX BQ ot t .
SFX BQ ot te .
SFX BQ 0 e .
SFX BQ ot ta .
SFX BQ 0 a .
SFX BQ ot tev .
SFX BQ 0 ev .
SFX BQ ot tu .
SFX BQ 0 u .
SFX BQ ot tah .
SFX BQ 0 ah .
SFX BQ ot tam .
SFX BQ 0 am .
SFX BQ ot tem .
SFX BQ 0 em .
SFX BQ ot tami .
SFX BQ 0 ami .

SFX BR Y 25
SFX BR i e .
SFX BR i a .
SFX BR i ego .
SFX BR i u .
SFX BR i ej .
SFX BR i em .
SFX BR i emu .
SFX BR 0 m .
SFX BR i eju .
SFX BR 0 h .
SFX BR 0 mi .
SFX BR i ejši/zz .
SFX BR i ejšego .
SFX BR i ejšemu .
SFX BR i ejšim .
SFX BR i ejšem .
SFX BR i ejše .
SFX BR i ejša .
SFX BR i ejšu .
SFX BR i ejšej .
SFX BR i ejšeju .
SFX BR i ejših .
SFX BR i ejšim .
SFX BR i ejšimi .
SFX BR i eje/zz .
