isv_lat_hunspell_dict.dic
zadržati/BE
děte/BF
hristijanin/BG
inočto/BH
dodati/BI
kto-nebud/BJ
lizati/BK
sobě/BL
si/BM
liti/BN
črnogorjanin/BG
plamenj/BP
lakot/BQ
izključiti/BD
sinji/BR
jezyk/BO
čuti/BN
dati/BI
bok/BO
najgorši/BR
zvuk/BO
krok/BO
iměti/BN
muslimanin/BG
strčiti/BD
obči/BR
naležati/BE
označiti/BD
kričati/BE
oblak/BO
dojiti/BD
prědati/BI
děti/BN
nogot/BQ
rizik/BO
razviti/BN
položiti/BD
kamenj/BP
skazati/BK
slyšati/BE
slovjanin/BG
slědujuči/BR
mak/BO
učiti/BD
tvorčji/BR
uslyšati/BE
ječmenj/BP
uspokojiti/BD
narušiti/BD
vsečto/BH
založiti/BD
myti/BN
prodolžiti/BD
grěti/BN
zvučati/BE
strajk/BO
pokazati/BK
grebenj/BP
mazati/BK
dateljnik/BO
kazati/BK
piti/BN
gorši/BR
grěšiti/BD
stojati/BE
ubiti/BN
vključiti/BD
časovnik/BO
jelenj/BP
rybnik/BO
prědšedši/BR
blok/BO
vezati/BK
dušiti/BD
izpiti/BN
držati/BE
kryti/BN
ležati/BE
nastoječi/BR
niščiti/BD
ječati/BE
prědskazati/BK
gradžanin/BG
korenj/BP
daljši/BR
kremenj/BP
nakazati/BK
prnik/BO
seljanin/BG
spěšiti/BD
najlučši/BR
iměti/BN
rězati/BK
ček/BO
tok/BO
svezati/BK
naznačiti/BD
goreči/BR
razdati/BI
obvezati/BK
obliti/BN
iměti/BN
nepokojiti/BD
zrěti/BN
biti/BN
pobiti/BN
ranši/BR
věk/BO
lěčiti/BD
namočiti/BD
prodati/BI
trikutnik/BO
odrězati/BK
duži/BR
podliti/BN
glasnik/BO
konjak/BO
čajnik/BO
izdati/BI
vodotok/BO
sumrak/BO
vozdati/BI
podati/BI
zaključiti/BD
svěži/BR
prašek/BO
briti/BN
gniti/BN
oddati/BI
probiti/BN
zadati/BI
popiti/BN
izgniti/BN
odbočiti/BD
izkonavči/BR
najglubši/BR
imeniteljnik/BO
prěvažiti/BD
otegčiti/BD
proliti/BN
držati/BE
zapisnik/BO
člověčji/BR
urězati/BK
indijanin/BG
blizši/BR
dati/BI
děvičji/BR
dokazati/BK
stačiti/BD
doždnik/BO
gadji/BR
hladnějši/BR
izrězati/BK
klik/BO
krasnějši/BR
cvětuči/BR
mladši/BR
najbogatši/BR
največši/BR
najkrasivši/BR
najkrvavši/BR
najmenši/BR
najpozdnějši/BR
najzimnějši/BR
obrězati/BK
odučiti/BD
petikutnik/BO
povyši/BR
prěrězati/BK
prěsvezati/BK
priložiti/BD
razbiti/BN
razvivajuči/BR
ravnoznačnik/BO
šestikutnik/BO
udivjajuči/BR
vozvršiti/BD
zabolěvši/BR
zakazati/BK
barak/BO
lučši/BR
prašiti/BD
vojevničji/BR
četyrokutnik/BO
žučji/BR
vtornik/BO
zadržati/BE
zvateljnik/BO
dvorjanin/BG
prětolmačiti/BD
prědložnik/BO
suči/BR
nadati/BI
dnevnik/BO
iměti/BN
legši/BR
luk/BO
mekčiti/BD
najprostějši/BR
oblizati/BK
pogrěšiti/BD
pončik/BO
razdvojiti/BD
razgovornik/BO
svezati/BK
šeršenj/BP
sušiti/BD
trojskok/BO
vezati/BK
zadržnik/BO
zavezati/BK
žedajuči/BR
bezpokojiti/BD
čto/BH
množiti/BD
něčto/BH
ničto/BH
odkazati/BK
okazati/BK
omržajuči/BR
prikazati/BK
rabotči/BR
razlučiti/BD
srbolužičanin/BG
ubědžajuči/BR
ukazati/BK
angličanin/BG
doložiti/BD
italijanin/BG
měščanin/BG
moguči/BR
nabiti/BN
navezati/BK
odbiti/BN
podležati/BE
prěčiti/BD
prinaležati/BE
tuk/BO
občiti/BD
frank/BO
odročiti/BD
privezati/BK
razkazati/BK
rušiti/BD
směti/BN
umarjajuči/BR
urok/BO
stojati/BE
nastojati/BE
pristojati/BE
strojiti/BD
tužiti/BD
otok/BO
styk/BO
razvezati/BK
uveličiti/BD
povsednji/BR
sovršiti/BD
značek/BO
dati/BI
zapalnik/BO
šiti/BN
zašiti/BN
prišiti/BN
iměti/BN
iměti/BN
skvrčati/BE
vpiti/BN
marsianin/BG
utěšiti/BD
namordnik/BO
politi/BN
imponujuči/BR
izbiti/BN
podgrěti/BN
bazilik/BO
brěk/BO
byčji/BR
dolžiti/BD
držati/BE
gojiti/BD
golk/BO
golubji/BR
gorjanin/BG
gusji/BR
izliti/BN
izopačiti/BD
izplěti/BN
iztok/BO
jelenji/BR
ježiti/BD
kopytnik/BO
kravji/BR
labedji/BR
lojiti/BD
masljak/BO
medvědji/BR
nagrěti/BN
nakolěnnik/BO
naliti/BN
napojiti/BD
narězati/BK
našiti/BN
navezati/BK
naviti/BN
navoščiti/BD
nizati/BK
obmazati/BK
obriti/BN
obvezati/BK
obviti/BN
izdati/BI
odklejiti/BD
oglavnik/BO
omužiti/BD
opiti/BN
oplěti/BN
orlji/BR
ostrovjanin/BG
osušiti/BD
prstenj/BP
ranji/BR
razgraničiti/BD
razgrěti/BN
različiti/BD
razliti/BN
razmazati/BK
razrězati/BK
saundtrek/BO
tlěti/BN
vděti/BN
viti/BN
vražiti/BD
vyti/BN
zlověšči/BR
plěti/BN
hak/BO
pomazati/BK
namazati/BK
vozklicalnik/BO
voščiti/BD
razprodati/BI
seksi/BR
smrščiti/BD
větrik/BO
skok/BO
nanizati/BK
sviti/BN
razprašiti/BD
ryti/BN
izšiti/BN
trevožiti/BD
ponižajuči/BR
prěvažajuči/BR
inoplanetjanin/BG
ulučšiti/BD
nebožčik/BO
nedějuči/BR
najboljši/BR
pridati/BI
prěložiti/BD
egipčanin/BG
odgovarjajuči/BR
bifštek/BO
finik/BO
vsevěduči/BR
pribiti/BN
odvezati/BK
sliti/BN
iměti/BN
poddati/BI
diplodok/BO
odbočiti/BD
rudnik/BO
iměti/BN
podključiti/BD
odliti/BN
iměti/BN
